en: Crampon attachment type: Hybrid; Step-in; Strap-on; Other
de: Steigeisenbefestigungstyp: Hybrid; Step-in; Umschnallen; Sonstiges
ru: Тип крепления кошек: Гибридные; Надевающийся; Пристегивающийся; Другое
sv: Typ av fäste för stegjärn: Hybrid; Insteg; Spänna fast; Övrigt
fi: Jäärautojen kiinnitystyyppi: Hybridi; Pujotettava; Hihnalla kiinnitettävä; Muu
ja: クランプンアタッチメントタイプ: ハイブリッド; ステップイン; ストラップオン; その他
hu: Hótalp rögzítési típusa: Hibrid; Step-in; Strap-on; Egyéb
it: Tipo di attacco per ramponi: Ibrido; Step-in; Strap-on; Altro
nl: Type bevestiging stijgijzers: Hybride; Instap; Strap-on; Andere
tr: Krampon bağlantı tipi: Hibrit; İçeri sokma; Askılı; Diğer
pl: Rodzaj mocowania raków: Hybrydowy; Wkroczenie; Na pasek; Inne
ko: 아이젠 부착 타입: 하이브리드; 스텝인; 스트랩온; 기타
da: Type af cramponudstyr: Hybrid; Træd-i; Strap-on; Andet
fr: Type de fixation des crampons: Hybrid; Fixation; Gode-ceinture; Autre
zh-TW: 冰爪附件類型: 混合; 穿入式; 捆綁式; 其他
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์ยึดแครมปอน: แบบไฮบริด; ประกอบ; คาด; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipo de acessório de grampo: Híbrida; Sem cadarço; Amarração; Outro
bg-BG: Тип закрепване на котки за обувки: Хибридни; Автомат; Каишки; Други
pt-PT: Tipo de acessório para crampons: Híbrido; Entrada; Com alça; Outro
sk-SK: Typ pripevnenia stúpačiek: Hybridný; Pripevnenie vpredu aj vzadu; Pripevnenie vpredu a remienok; Iné
lt-LT: Kačių tvirtinimo tipas: Hibridinė; Automatinės; Užsegamos dirželiu; Kita
nb: Broddfestetype: Hybrid; Stig-inn; Stropp på; Annet
el: Τύπος προσάρτησης κραμπόν: Υβριδικό; Φορετό; Δετό; Άλλο
vi: Loại đính kèm móc sắt: Ván kết hợp; Khóa bước vào; Đeo vào; Khác
es: Tipo de sujeción de crampón: Híbrido; De entrar; Correa a presión; Otros
ro-RO: Tip fixare crampon: Hibrid; Step-in; Fixare cu curea; Altele
zh-CN: 攀岩用鞋底钉的固定类型: 混合型; 踩入式; 捆绑式; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta namestitve derez: Hibridni; Pripenjanje; Privezovanje; Drugo
hr-HR: Način pričvršćivanja dereza: Hibridno; Step-in; Privezivanje; Ostalo
cs: Typ upevnění mačky: Hybridní; Vstup bez vázání; Na popruh; Jiné